Missouri, session 2026, HB3206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 149.011, 149.035, 149.160, 149.190, 407.924, 407.925, 407.926,
407.927, 407.928, 407.929, 407.931, and 407.934, RSMo, are repealed and seventeen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 149.011, 149.035, 149.036, 149.037,
149.038, 149.039, 149.160, 149.190, 407.924, 407.925, 407.926, 407.927, 407.928, 407.929,
407.930, 407.931, and 407.934, to read as follows:
149.011. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Alternative nicotine product", any noncombustible product containing
nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human consumption, whether
chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means. "Alternative nicotine
product" does not include any vapor product, tobacco product, or any product
regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under
Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(2) "Cigar", any roll for smoking, except cigarettes, made chiefly of tobacco or any
substitute therefor;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3206 2
[(2)] (3) "Cigarette", an item manufactured of tobacco or any substitute therefor,
wrapped in paper or any substitute therefor, weighing not to exceed three pounds per one
thousand cigarettes and which is commonly classified, labeled or advertised as a cigarette;
[(3)] (4) "Common carrier", any person, association, company, or corporation
engaged in the business of operating, for public use, an agency for the transportation of
persons or property within the state;
(5) "Department", the department of revenue;
[(4)] (6) "Director", the director of Missouri department of revenue;
[(5)] (7) "First sale within the state", the first sale of a tobacco product, alternative
nicotine product, or vapor product by a manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, retailer, or
other person to a retailer or otherperson who intends to sell such [tobacco] products at retail
or to a person at retail within the state of Missouri;
[(6)] (8) "Manufacturer", any person engaged in the manufacture or production of
cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products;
[(7)] (9) "Manufacturer's invoice price", the original net invoice price for which a
manufacturer sells a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product to a
distributor, wholesaler, retailer, or first seller in the state as shown by the manufacturer's
original invoice;
[(8)] (10) "Meter machine", a type of device manufactured for the use of printing or
imprinting an inked impression indicating that the cigarette tax has been paid on an individual
package of cigarettes;
(11) "Nicotine analogue":
(a) a. A substance, the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the
chemical structure of nicotine; or
b. A substance that has, purports to have, or is represented to have an effect on
the central nervous system that is similar to or greater than the nicotine's effect on the
central nervous system;
(b) Factors relevant to determining whether a substance is a nicotine analogue
include, but are not limited to, the marketing, advertising, and labeling of the substance
and whether the substance has been manufactured, formulated, sold, distributed, or
marketed with the intent to avoid the provisions of this subdivision and other applicable
provisions of law;
[(9)] (12) "Package of cigarettes", a container of any type composition in which is
normally contained twenty individual cigarettes, except as in special instances when the
number may be more or less than twenty;
[(10)] (13) "Person", any individual, corporation, firm, partnership, incorporated or
unincorporated association, or any other legal or commercial entity;

HB 3206 3
[(11)] (14) "Retailer", any person who sells to a consumer or to any person for any
purpose other than resale;
[(12)] (15) "Sale" in this instance is defined to be and declared to include sales,
barters, exchanges and every other manner, method and form of transferring the ownership of
personal property from one person to another. "Sale" also means the possession of cigarettes
[or], tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products by any person
other than a manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or retailer and shall be prima facie
evidence of possession for consumption;
[(13)] (16) "Smokeless tobacco", chewing tobacco, including, but not limited to,
twist, moist plug, loose leaf and firm plug, and all types of snuff, including, but not limited to,
moist and dry;
[(14)] (17) "Stamped cigarettes", an individual package, containing twenty individual
cigarettes, more or less, on which appears or is affixed or imprinted thereon a Missouri state
cigarette tax stamp or Missouri state meter machine impression;
[(15)] (18) "Tax stamp", an item manufactured of a paper product or substitute thereof
on which is printed, imprinted, or engraved lettering, numerals or symbols indicating that the
cigarette tax has been paid on each individual package of cigarettes;
[(16)] (19) "Tobacco product", cigarettes, cigarette papers, clove cigarettes, cigars,
smokeless tobacco, smoking tobacco, or other form of tobacco products or products made
with tobacco substitute containing nicotine;
[(17)] (20) "Unstamped cigarettes", an individual package containing cigarettes on
which does not appear a Missouri state cigarette tax stamp or Missouri state meter machine
impression;
(21) "Vapor product", any noncombustible product containing nicotine or a
nicotine analogue that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or
other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be
used to produce vapor from nicotine in a solution or other form. "Vapor product"
includes any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or
similar product or device and any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine in a
solution or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette,
electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device.
"Vapor product" also includes any device classified by the United States Food and Drug
Administration as an electronic nicotine delivery system. "Vapor product" does not
include any alternative nicotine product or tobacco product;
[(18)] (22) "Wholesaler", any person, firm or corporation organized and existing, or
doing business, primarily to sell cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor products,
or tobacco products to, and render service to, retailers in the territory the person, firm or

HB 3206 4
corporation chooses to serve; that purchases cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor
products, or tobacco products directly from the manufacturer; that carries at all times at his
or her or its principal place of business a representative stock of cigarettes, alternative
nicotine products, vapor products, or tobacco products for sale; and that comes into the
possession of cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor products,or tobacco products
for the purpose of selling them to other wholesalers, distributors, retailers, or to persons
outside or within the state who might resell or retail the cigarettes, alternative nicotine
products, vapor products, or tobacco products to consumers. This shall include any
manufacturer, distributor, importer, jobber, broker, agent, or other person, whether or not
enumerated in this chapter, who so sells or so distributes cigarettes, alternative nicotine
products, vapor products, or tobacco products.
149.035. 1. Every wholesaler of cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor
products, or tobacco products in this state, as a condition of carrying on such business, shall
annually, on or before February fifteenth of each year, secure from the director a written
license, and shall pay therefor an annual fee of one hundred dollars for the twelve-month
period beginning February fifteenth of each year. The license, application for which may be
made on forms prescribed and furnished by the director, shall be kept on public display in the
wholesaler's place of business at all times. The license shall not be assignable or transferable.
The director shall refuse a license to any wholesaler of cigarettes, alternative nicotine
products, vapor products, or tobacco products from another state if that wholesaler's state
refuses to license wholesalers of cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor products,
or tobacco products from Missouri.
2. Every person making a first sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products in the state of Missouri who does not have a wholesaler license
as required by this section shall make application for a tobacco products wholesaler license
on forms prescribed by the director of revenue. Such person shall, as a condition of acquiring
such license, file an instrument which may be a cash or surety bond, letter of credit, or other
instrument approved by the director which shall be in the amount of three times the average
tax liability, estimated in the case of a new applicant. At such time as the director of revenue
shall deem the amount of a bond insufficient to cover the liability, he may require the bond to
be adjusted to the level satisfactory to the director which shall cover the amount of such
liability. Minimum bond shall be five hundred dollars. A tobacco products wholesaler
license shall not be used as a substitute or in place of a cigarette wholesale license.
3. At such time as the director shall have reason to believe that any person has
violated any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations issued pursuant to such
provisions, the director shall refuse to issue or shall revoke or suspend any license issued

HB 3206 5
hereunder for such a period of time not to exceed one year. The person involved may seek
review of the decision of the director of revenue by the administrative hearing commission.
149.036. Every manufacturer of cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor
products, or tobacco products sold at retail or to a consumer in this state, whether
directly or through an importer, wholesaler, distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary
or intermediaries, shall annually, on or before February fifteenth of each year, secure
from the director a written tobacco products manufacturer license and pay an annual
fee of one thousand dollars for the twelve-month period beginning February fifteenth of
each year. The license shall not be assignable or transferable. Manufacturers of vapor
products shall be issued a license only if they also satisfy the requirements of sections
149.037 to 149.038.
149.037. 1. Every vapor product manufacturer who sells or offers to sell vapor
products to a consumer in this state, whether directly or through an importer,
wholesaler, distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, shall obtain a
vapor product manufacturer license from the director. The license shall be valid for one
year and shall be renewed annually.
2. Every application for a vapor product manufacturer license shall be made
upon a form prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the director and shall be
accompanied by a certification signed under penalty of perjury that includes the
following:
(1) The name and address of the applicant or, if the applicant is a firm,
partnership, limited liability company, or association, the name and address of each of
its members or, if the applicant is a corporation, the name and address of each of its
officers and the address of its principal place of business;
(2) The location of the principal place of the applicant seeking a license;
(3) Either:
(a) A copy of the Prevent All Cigarette Trafficking (PACT) Act Registration
Form (ATF Form 5070.1) as submitted by the applicant to the Bureau of Alcohol,
Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives of the United States Department of Justice and an
attestation that the applicant is in compliance with, and will continue to comply with, all
applicable requirements of 15 U.S.C. Sections 375 and 376; or
(b) A statement explaining why the PACT Act is not applicable to the applicant
and its products;
(4) An attestation that the applicant will comply with all applicable laws of this
state and of the applicant's principal place of business;
(5) A list of each type or model of vapor product of the manufacturer that is sold
in this state, including for each product:

HB 3206 6
(a) The product name, product category, nicotine content (volume of nicotine by
weight), and total volume; and
(b) A description, if a formal authorization, approval, or order from United
States Food and Drug Administration under Section 387e(j) or 387j of the Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Section 301 et seq.), as amended, has been sought and, if so,
the status of any request for that authorization, approval, or order;
(6) An attestation that the applicant's products and all components or parts of
such products sold in this state were imported into the United States in conformity with
all United States Customs and Border Protection requirements, whether or not such
importation was accomplished by the manufacturer or another entity. In addition, the
manufacturer shall obtain and submit copies of all Customs and Border Protection
entry forms submitted in the prior six months on which the products, or any
components or parts of the products, were declared;
(7) For an applicant with a principal place of business outside the United States,
a declaration, on a form prescribed by the department, from each of its importers into
the United States of any of its brands to be sold in this state, that the importer accepts
joint and several liability with the applicant for all liability imposed in accordance with
this chapter, including any fees, costs, attorney's fees, and penalties imposed;
(8) A list of any warning letters issued by the United States Food and Drug
Administration in the last five calendar years that identified any vapor products
manufactured by the applicant as being adulterated or misbranded under federal law
and a description of how and when each warning letter was resolved;
(9) Records reflecting the youth-access prevention policies the applicant has
implemented with respect to distributors and retailers that sell its vapor products in the
state; and
(10) Such other information as the director may require.
3. The applicant shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars for each
type or model of vapor product that is included on the list of products in the certification
form.
4. A vapor product manufacturer shall not cause to be sold at retail in this state
or to a consumer in this state any type or model of vapor product not included in the
product list provided with the certification without first:
(1) Filing an amended certification form in a form and manner prescribed by the
department; and
(2) Paying the appropriate fee required under this section.
5. Each vapor product manufacturer who obtains a license under this chapter
shall submit to the director:

HB 3206 7
(1) Within thirty days of any changes to its product list submitted with its
certification, a notice of such changes; and
(2) Every six months, an attestation confirming that the information submitted
in its license application remains accurate and all copies of Customs and Border Patrol
Form 7501 submitted in the prior six months.
6. Submission of a false certification shall constitute an unfair trade practice
under the provisions of sections 375.930 to 375.948. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of sections 376.2050
to 376.2053. The director may notify appropriate federal and state agencies regarding
false information submitted on a certification form.
7. Fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be used by the director
for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.
8. A person who obtains a license under this chapter has established minimum
contacts with the state and consents to the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the
person in the courts of this state in any matter or issue arising under this chapter or
related to the sale of vapor products.
9. The director shall maintain and make publicly available on the director’s
official website a list of all vapor products included in the product lists submitted by
licensed vapor product manufacturers with their certification forms. The director also
shall maintain a list of all licensed entities, including information regarding violations
and licenses that have been revoked or suspended.
10. Beginning September 1, 2026, vapor products not included in the list shall
not be sold for retail sale or to a consumer in this state, either directly or through an
importer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries.
149.038. 1. Any nonresident manufacturer of vapor products that has not
registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as
a condition precedent to receiving a license, appoint and continually engage without
interruption the services of an agent in this state to act as agent for the service of process
on whom all process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning or arising out
of the enforcement of this chapter, may be served in any manner authorized by law.
Such service shall constitute legal and valid service of process on the manufacturer. The
manufacturer shall provide the name, address, telephone number, and proof of the
appointment and availability of such agent to the department.
2. The manufacturer shall provide notice to the department thirty calendar days
prior to termination of the authority of an agent and shall further provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department of the appointment of a new agent no less than five
calendar days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment. In the event an

HB 3206 8
agent terminates an agency appointment, the manufacturer shall notify the department
of the termination within five calendar days and shall include proof to the satisfaction of
the department of the appointment of a new agent.
3. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer of vapor products that has not
registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as
a condition precedent to receiving a license, submit to the director a surety bond or
other cash security payable to the state in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars.
The bond shall be posted by a corporate surety located within the United States.
4. The bond described under subsection 3 of this section shall be conditioned on
the performance by the manufacturer of all requirements and obligations imposed by
this chapter. A surety on a manufacturer's bond shall be liable up to the amount of the
bond, and the state may execute on such surety bond for the payment of fines and
penalties imposed on the manufacturer under this section and for the costs of seizure
and destruction of products sold in violation of this chapter. If the state executes on the
surety bond, it may require the manufacturer to provide an additional bond as a
condition precedent for retaining the vapor product manufacturer license.
5. A surety on a bond furnished by a manufacturer as provided in this section
shall be released and discharged from liability to the state accruing on the bond after
expiration of sixty days from the date upon which such surety lodges with the director a
written request to be released and discharged. This provision shall not operate to
relieve, release, or discharge the surety from liability already accrued or which shall
accrue before the expiration of the sixty-day period. The director shall, upon receiving
any such request, notify the manufacturer who furnished the bond. Unless the
manufacturer, on or before the expiration of the sixty-day period, files with the director
a new bond, with the surety approved by and acceptable to the director, the director
shall revoke the manufacturer's vapor product manufacturer license.
149.039. 1. Wholesalers and retailers shall purchase cigarettes, alternative
nicotine products, vapor products, and tobacco products only from a manufacturer or
wholesaler who has obtained a valid tobacco product manufacturer or wholesaler
license from the director.
2. Retailers shall purchase cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor
products, or tobacco products only from a wholesaler or manufacturer who has
obtained a license from the director. Manufacturers and wholesalers shall sell
cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor products, and tobacco products only to a
wholesaler or retailer who has obtained the applicable valid license or licenses from the
director under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 407.

HB 3206 9
3. Before selling cigarettes, alternative nicotine products, vapor products, or
tobacco products to a wholesaler or retailer, a manufacturer or wholesaler shall confirm
the purchaser has obtained the applicable valid license or licenses from the director
under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 407. Before purchasing cigarettes,
alternative nicotine products, vapor products, or tobacco products from a manufacturer
or wholesaler, a licensee shall confirm the seller has obtained the applicable valid license
or licenses from the director.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, cigarettes, alternative nicotine
products, vapor products, or tobacco products sold by a person or entity that lacks the
required license are contraband. The director may seize and destroy or dispose of such
products. The cost of such seizure and destruction or disposal shall be borne by the
person from whom the products are confiscated.
149.160. 1. A tax is levied upon the first sale of tobacco products, other than
cigarettes, within the state. The tax on tobacco products shall be at the rate of ten percent of
the manufacturer's invoice price before discounts and deals, and shall be paid by the person
making the first sale within the state. Licensed persons making first sales within the state
shall be allowed approved credit for returned merchandise provided the tax was paid on the
returned merchandise and the purchaser was given a refund or credit. Such licensed person
shall take such approved credit on the return for the month in which the purchaser was given
the refund or credit. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, for the
purposes of the application of the tax imposed under this section, the term "tobacco
products" shall include alternative nicotine products and vapor products.
2. The tax shall not apply to tobacco products when the first sale within the state has
occurred on such tobacco products prior to October 1, 1993.
3. Amounts generated by the tax levied in this section shall be deposited in the health
initiatives fund created by section 191.831.
4. When the general assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of
the net federal reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, this section shall
expire. As used in this section, "net federal reimbursement allowance" shall mean that
amount of the federal reimbursement allowance in excess of the amount of state matching
funds necessary for the state to make payments required by subsection 1 of section 208.471
or, if the payments exceed the amount so required, the actual payments made for the purposes
specified in subsection 1 of section 208.471.
149.190. 1. If the director is not satisfied that the report filed or the amount of tax
paid is accurate, he may, after investigating and upon finding such inaccuracy, make an
assessment of tax due based upon such investigation. The director shall give written notice

HB 3206 10
by registered or certified mail to the person of the assessment, addressed to the person at his
last known address.
2. If a person fails to file any return required by section 149.170, the director shall
make an estimate, based upon information available to him, for the period for which the
person failed to file the return and, upon the basis of the estimate, shall assess the tax due
from such person. The director shall give to the person written notice of the assessment by
registered or certified mail to the person's last known address.
3. Any person responsible for the tax imposed in section 149.160 who fails to pay
such tax within the time and manner required by law, shall pay, as part of the tax imposed, a
penalty equal to twenty-five percent of the tax liability, and the tax shall bear interest at the
rate established in section 32.065.
4. Any person not possessing a valid tobacco products manufacturer or wholesaler
license, a valid tobacco retail license as required under section 407.934 if applicable, or
any other license required by the department, and who is selling tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products at retail within the state, [when] or any
person who possesses such valid license or licenses and is selling such products at retail
within the state but such [tobacco] products have not been purchased from a licensed
wholesaler or manufacturer, shall be subject to all applicable provisions of subsections 1 to
3 of this section. Such person shall also be assessed an additional penalty equal to one
hundred percent of the tax owed.
5. Any person[, other than a licensed wholesaler,] making sales of tobacco products to
unlicensed retailers or wholesalers in the state shall be subject to all applicable provisions of
subsections 1 to 3 of this section. Such person shall also be assessed an additional penalty
equal to one hundred percent of the tax owed.
407.924. 1. The division of [liquor] alcohol and tobacco control within the
department of public safety shall implement and enforce the provisions of sections [407.925]
407.924 to 407.934.
2. Beginning January 1, 2003, the division of [liquor] alcohol and tobacco control
shall submit an annual report to the general assembly on the effectiveness of sections
[407.925] 407.924 to 407.934 in reducing tobacco product, alternative nicotine product,
and vapor product possession or use by minors and the enforcement activities by the
division for violations of sections [407.925] 407.924 to 407.934.
407.925. As used in sections [407.925] 407.924 to 407.934, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Alternative nicotine product", any noncombustible product containing nicotine
or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed,
dissolved, or ingested by any other means. Alternative nicotine product does not include any

HB 3206 11
vapor product, tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United
States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(2) "Center of youth activities", any playground, school or other facility, when such
facility is being used primarily by persons under the age of eighteen for recreational,
educational or other purposes;
(3) "Distribute", a conveyance to the public by sale, barter, gift or sample;
(4) "Division", the division of alcohol and tobacco control;
(5) "Minor", a person under the age of eighteen;
[(5)] (6) "Municipality", the city, village or town within which tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products or vapor products are sold or distributed or, in the case of
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products or vapor products that are not sold or
distributed within a city, village or town, the county in which they are sold or distributed;
(7) "Nicotine analogue":
(a) a. A substance, the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the
chemical structure of nicotine; or
b. A substance that has, purports to have, or is represented to have an effect on
the central nervous system that is similar to or greater than the nicotine's effect on the
central nervous system;
(b) Factors relevant to determining whether a substance is a nicotine analogue
include, but are not limited to, the marketing, advertising, and labeling of the substance
and whether the substance has been manufactured, formulated, sold, distributed, or
marketed with the intent to avoid the provisions of this subdivision and other applicable
provisions of law;
[(6)] (8) "Person", an individual, partnership, copartnership, firm, company, public or
private corporation, association, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision or any
agency, board, department or bureau of the state or federal government, or any other legal
entity which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties;
[(7)] (9) "Proof of age", a driver's license or other generally accepted means of
identification that contains a picture of the individual and appears on its face to be valid;
[(8)] (10) "Rolling papers", paper designed, manufactured, marketed, or sold for use
primarily as a wrapping or enclosure for tobacco, which enables a person to roll loose tobacco
into a smokable cigarette;
[(9)] (11) "Sample", a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product
distributed to members of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product
promotional purposes;
[(10)] (12) "Sampling", the distribution to members of the general public of tobacco
product, alternative nicotine product or vapor product samples;

HB 3206 12
[(11)] (13) "Tobacco products", any substance [containing tobacco leaf,] made or
derived from tobacco or nicotine that is intended for human consumption including, but
not limited to, cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, snuff, chewing tobacco, or dipping tobacco but
does not include alternative nicotine products, or vapor products;
[(12)] (14) "Vapor product", any noncombustible product containing nicotine that
employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or
mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to produce vapor from
nicotine or a nicotine analogue in a solution or other form. Vapor product includes any
electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or
device and any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine in a solution or other form that is
intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo,
electronic pipe, or similar product or device. "Vapor product" also includes any device
classified by the United States Food and Drug Administration as an electronic nicotine
delivery system. Vapor product does not include any alternative nicotine product or tobacco
product;
[(13)] (15) "Vending machine", any mechanical electric or electronic, self-service
device which, upon insertion of money, tokens or any other form of payment, dispenses
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
407.926. 1. Any person or entity who sells tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products shall deny the sale of such [tobacco] products to any person who
is less than eighteen years of age.
2. Any person or entity who sells or distributes tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products by mail or through the internet in this state in violation of
subsection 1 of this section shall be assessed a fine of two hundred fifty dollars for the first
violation and five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation.
3. Alternative nicotine products and vapor products shall only be sold to persons
eighteen years of age or older, shall be subject to local and state sales tax and licensing
requirements, [but shall not be otherwise] and shall be taxed [or] and regulated as tobacco
products.
4. (1) Any nicotine liquid container that is sold at retail in this state shall satisfy the
child-resistant effectiveness standards set forth in 16 CFR 1700.15(b) as in effect on August
28, 2015, when tested in accordance with the method described in 16 CFR 1700.20 as in
effect on August 28, 2015.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection, "nicotine liquid container" shall mean a bottle
or other container of liquid or other substance containing nicotine if the liquid or substance is
sold, marketed, or intended for use in a vapor product. A "nicotine liquid container" shall not
include a liquid or other substance containing nicotine or nicotine analogue in a cartridge

HB 3206 13
that is sold, marketed, or intended for use in a vapor product, provided that such cartridge is
prefilled and sealed by the manufacturer and not intended to be opened by the consumer.
(3) Any person who engages in retail sales of liquid nicotine containers in this state in
violation of this subsection shall be assessed a fine of two hundred fifty dollars for the first
violation and five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation.
(4) The department of health and senior services may adopt rules necessary to carry
out the provisions of this subsection. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2015, shall be
invalid and void.
(5) The provisions of this subsection and any rules adopted hereunder shall be null,
void, and of no force and effect upon the effective date of the final regulations issued by the
federal Food and Drug Administration or from any other federal agency if such regulations
mandate child-resistant effectiveness standards for nicotine liquid containers.
407.927. The owner of an establishment at which tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, vapor products, or rolling papers are sold at retail or through vending
machines shall cause to be prominently displayed in a conspicuous place at every display
from which tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products are sold and on
every vending machine where [tobacco] such products are purchased a sign that shall:
(1) Contain in red lettering at least one-half inch high on a white background the
following: "It is a violation of state law for cigarettes, other tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to be sold or otherwise provided to any person under the
age of eighteen or for such person to purchase, attempt to purchase or possess cigarettes, other
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products."; and
(2) Include a depiction of a pack of cigarettes at least two inches high defaced by a
red diagonal diameter of a surrounding red circle, and the words "Under 18".
407.928. No person or entity shall sell individual packs of cigarettes, tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, vapor products, or smokeless tobacco products
unless such packs or products satisfy one of the following conditions prior to the time of
sale:
(1) It is sold through a vending machine; or
(2) It is displayed behind the check-out counter or it is within the unobstructed line of
sight of the sales clerk or store attendant from the checkout counter.

HB 3206 14
407.929. 1. A person or entity selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products,
or vapor products or rolling papers or distributing tobacco product, alternative nicotine
product, or vapor product samples shall require proof of age from a prospective purchaser or
recipient if an ordinary person would conclude on the basis of appearance that such
prospective purchaser or recipient may be under the age of eighteen.
2. The operator's or chauffeur's license issued pursuant to the provisions of section
302.177, or the operator's or chauffeur's license issued pursuant to the laws of any state or
possession of the United States to residents of those states or possessions, or an identification
card as provided for in section 302.181, or the identification card issued by any uniformed
service of the United States, or a valid passport shall be presented by the holder thereof upon
request of any agent of the division [of liquor control] or any owner or employee of an
establishment that sells tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products,
for the purpose of aiding the registrant, agent, or employee to determine whether or not the
person is at least eighteen years of age when such person desires to purchase or possess
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products procured from a registrant.
Upon such presentation, the owner or employee of the establishment shall compare the
photograph and physical characteristics noted on the license, identification card or passport
with the physical characteristics of the person presenting the license, identification card, or
passport.
3. Any person who shall, without authorization from the department of revenue,
reproduce, alter, modify, or misrepresent any chauffeur's license, motor vehicle operator's
license, or identification card shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, and confinement for not more
than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
4. Reasonable reliance on proof of age or on the appearance of the purchaser or
recipient shall be a defense to any action for a violation of subsections 1, 2 and 3 of section
407.931. No person shall be liable for more than one violation of subsections 2 and 3 of
section 407.931 on any single day.
407.930. 1. For the purposes of this section, "tobacco substitute" means any
alternative nicotine products or vapor products that have not been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration for tobacco cessation or other medical
purposes.
2. No person shall market, advertise, sell, or cause to be sold a tobacco substitute
if the product's container, packaging, or advertising:
(1) Depicts a cartoon-like fictional character that mimics a character primarily
aimed at entertaining minors;

HB 3206 15
(2) Imitates or mimics trademarks or trade dress of products that are or have
been primarily marketed to minors;
(3) Includes a symbol that is primarily used to market products to minors;
(4) Includes an image of a celebrity; or
(5) Is designed to disguise the fact that it is a tobacco substitute.
3. No person shall market, advertise, sell, or cause to be sold a tobacco substitute
that has entertainment features, such as the ability to play games, play music or other
audio, display photos or video, or any similar electronic entertainment features.
4. No person shall market, advertise, sell, or cause to be sold a tobacco substitute
that contains, is mixed with, or is marketed as containing or being mixed with any
cannabinoids, alcohol, kratom, kava, mushrooms containing psilocybin or psilocin,
tianeptine, or any derivatives of those substances.
407.931. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, provide or distribute tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under eighteen years of
age.
2. All vending machines that dispense tobacco products, alternative nicotine products,
or vapor products shall be located within the unobstructed line of sight and under the direct
supervision of an adult responsible for preventing persons less than eighteen years of age
from purchasing any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product from
such machine or shall be equipped with a lock-out device to prevent the machines from being
operated until the person responsible for monitoring sales from the machines disables the
lock. Such locking device shall be of a design that prevents it from being left in an unlocked
condition and which will allow only a single sale when activated. A locking device shall not
be required on machines that are located in areas where persons less than eighteen years of
age are not permitted or prohibited by law. An owner of an establishment whose vending
machine is not in compliance with the provisions of this subsection shall be subject to the
penalties contained in subsection 5 of this section. A determination of noncompliance may be
made by a local law enforcement agency or the division [of liquor control]. Nothing in this
section shall apply to a vending machine if located in a factory, private club or other location
not generally accessible to the general public.
3. No person or entity shall sell, provide or distribute any tobacco product, alternative
nicotine product, or vapor product or rolling papers to any minor, or sell any individual
cigarettes to any person in this state. This subsection shall not apply to the distribution by
family members on property that is not open to the public.
4. Any person including, but not limited to, a sales clerk, owner or operator who
violates subsection 1, 2 or 3 of this section or section 407.927 shall be penalized as follows:
(1) For the first offense, twenty-five dollars;

HB 3206 16
(2) For the second offense, one hundred dollars;
(3) For a third and subsequent offense, two hundred fifty dollars.
5. Any owner of the establishment where tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products are available for sale who violates subsection 3 of this section, in
addition to the penalties established in subsection 4 of this section, shall be penalized in the
following manner:
(1) For the first violation per location within two years, a reprimand shall be issued by
the division [of liquor control];
(2) For the second violation per location within two years, the division [of liquor
control] shall issue a citation prohibiting the outlet from selling tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products for a twenty-four-hour period;
(3) For the third violation per location within two years, the division [of liquor
control] shall issue a citation prohibiting the outlet from selling tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products for a forty-eight-hour period;
(4) For the fourth and any subsequent violations per location within two years, the
division [of liquor control] shall issue a citation prohibiting the outlet from selling tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products for a five-day period.
6. Any owner of the establishment where tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products are available for sale who violates subsection 3 of this section
shall not be penalized pursuant to this section if such person documents the following:
(1) An in-house or other tobacco compliance employee training program was in place
to provide the employee with information on the state and federal regulations regarding sales
of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to minors. Such training
program must be attended by all employees who sell tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products to the general public;
(2) A signed statement by the employee stating that the employee has been trained
and understands the state laws and federal regulations regarding the sale of tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to minors; and
(3) Such in-house or other tobacco compliance training meets the minimum training
criteria, which shall not exceed a total of ninety minutes in length, established by the division
[of liquor control].
7. The exemption in subsection 6 of this section shall not apply to any person who is
considered the general owner or operator of the outlet where tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products are available for sale if:
(1) Four or more violations per location of subsection 3 of this section occur within a
one-year period; or

HB 3206 17
(2) Such person knowingly violates or knowingly allows his or her employees to
violate subsection 3 of this section.
8. If a sale is made by an employee of the owner of an establishment in violation of
sections [407.925] 407.924 to 407.934, the employee shall be guilty of an offense established
in subsections 1, 2 and 3 of this section. If a vending machine is in violation of section
407.927, the owner of the establishment shall be guilty of an offense established in
subsections 3 and 4 of this section. If a sample is distributed by an employee of a company
conducting the sampling, such employee shall be guilty of an offense established in
subsections 3 and 4 of this section.
9. A person cited for selling, providing or distributing any tobacco product,
alternative nicotine product, or vapor product to any individual less than eighteen years of age
in violation of subsection 1, 2 or 3 of this section shall conclusively be presumed to have
reasonably relied on proof of age of the purchaser or recipient, and such person shall not be
found guilty of such violation if such person raises and proves as an affirmative defense that
such individual presented a driver's license or other government-issued photo identification
purporting to establish that such individual was eighteen years of age or older.
10. Any person adversely affected by this section may file an appeal with the
administrative hearing commission which shall be adjudicated pursuant to the procedures
established in chapter 621.
407.934. 1. No person shall sell, provide, or distribute cigarettes, tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products unless the person has a retail sales tax license
and a tobacco retail license.
2. (1) The department of revenue shall permit persons to designate through the
internet or by including a place on all sales tax license applications for the applicant to
designate himself or herself as a seller of cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products and to provide a list of all locations where the applicant sells such
products.
(2) All persons selling, providing, or distributing tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products shall also apply to the department of revenue for a
tobacco retail license. The department of revenue also shall make available through the
internet the application for the tobacco retail license. A separate license is required for
each retail location where the applicant sells such products. A license shall be valid for
twelve months and shall be renewed annually. The fee for a license is two hundred
dollars per year.
(3) Retailers that sell tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products shall be subject to an initial inspection within ninety days of receiving a
tobacco retail license. Thereafter, retailers shall be subject to, at minimum, two

HB 3206 18
unannounced inspections. The division shall seize any products not in compliance with
this chapter or chapter 149, and the retailer shall be subject to a follow-up inspection
within thirty days following a violation.
(4) The department of revenue may deny an application and refuse to issue or
renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license issued to any person if it determines
that the licensee or the principals or managers at the licensable location of the applicant
or licensee have been found guilty of any fraud or misrepresentation in any connection;
convicted of robbery, extortion, burglary, larceny, embezzlement, fraudulent
conversion, gambling, perjury, bribery, treason, tax evasion, or racketeering; or
convicted of a felony within the last five years. The department of revenue may deny an
application and refuse to issue or renew a license if there is a reasonable basis to
determine the application is filed by a person as subterfuge for a different party of
interest whose license has previously been denied, canceled, or revoked for cause or a
violation under this chapter, chapter 149, or other applicable provision of law.
(5) The department of revenue and the division of alcohol and tobacco control
may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this
subsection.
3. On or before July first of each year, the department of revenue shall make available
to the division [of liquor control] and the department of mental health a complete list of every
establishment which sells cigarettes, other tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or
vapor products in this state.
4. The division [of liquor control] shall have the authority to inspect stores and
tobacco outlets for compliance with all laws related to access of tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to minors. The division may employ a person seventeen
years of age, with parental consent, to attempt to purchase tobacco for the purpose of
inspection or enforcement of tobacco laws.
5. The supervisor of the division [of liquor control] shall not use minors to enforce the
provisions of this chapter unless the supervisor promulgates rules that establish standards for
the use of minors. The supervisor shall establish mandatory guidelines for the use of minors
in investigations by a state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement authority which
shall be followed by such authority and which shall, at a minimum, provide for the following:
(1) The minor shall be seventeen years of age;
(2) The minor shall have a youthful appearance, and the minor, if a male, shall not
have facial hair or a receding hairline and if a female, shall not wear excessive makeup or
excessive jewelry;

HB 3206 19
(3) The state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement agency shall obtain
the consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian before the use of such minor on a form
approved by the supervisor;
(4) The state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement agency shall make a
photocopy of the minor's valid identification showing the minor's correct date of birth;
(5) Any attempt by such minor to purchase tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products shall be videotaped or audiotaped with equipment sufficient to
record all statements made by the minor and the seller of the [tobacco] product;
(6) The minor shall carry his or her own identification showing the minor's correct
date of birth and shall, upon request, produce such identification to the seller of the tobacco
product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product;
(7) The minor shall answer truthfully any questions about his or her age and shall not
remain silent when asked questions regarding his or her age;
(8) The minor shall not lie to the seller of the tobacco product, alternative nicotine
product, or vapor product to induce a sale of [tobacco] such products;
(9) The minor shall not be employed by the state, county, municipal or other local law
enforcement agency on an incentive or quota basis;
(10) The state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement agency shall, within
forty-eight hours, contact or take all reasonable steps to contact the owner or manager of the
establishment if a violation occurs;
(11) The state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement agency shall
maintain records of each visit to an establishment where a minor is used by the state, county,
municipal or other local law enforcement agency for a period of at least one year following
the incident, regardless of whether a violation occurs at each visit, and such records shall, at a
minimum, include the following information:
(a) The signed consent form of the minor's parent or legal guardian;
(b) A Polaroid photograph of the minor;
(c) A photocopy of the minor's valid identification, showing the minor's correct date
of birth;
(d) An information sheet completed by the minor on a form approved by the
supervisor; and
(e) The name of each establishment visited by the minor, and the date and time of
each visit.
6. If the state, county, municipal or other local law enforcement authority uses minors
in investigations or in enforcing or determining violations of this chapter or any local
ordinance and does not comply with the mandatory guidelines established by the supervisor
of [liquor] alcohol and tobacco control in subsection 5 of this section, the supervisor of

HB 3206 20
[liquor] alcohol and tobacco control shall not take any disciplinary action against the
establishment or seller pursuant to this chapter based on an alleged violation discovered when
using a minor and shall not cooperate in any way with the state, county, municipal or other
local law enforcement authority in prosecuting any alleged violation discovered when using a
minor.
7. Any commissioned law enforcement officer in the state may inspect the
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products offered for sale by a
retailer and shall seize any products not in compliance with the terms of this chapter or
chapter 149. The cost of such seizure and destruction or disposal shall be borne by the
100 person from whom the products are confiscated.
✔